Washington statutes.
RCW 41.34.010

Purpose.

The purpose of chapter 239, Laws of 1995 is to:

(1) Provide a fair and reasonable value from the retirement system for those who leave public employment before retirement;

(2) Increase flexibility for such employees to make transitions into other public or private sector employment;

(3) Increase employee options for addressing retirement needs, personal financial planning, and career transitions; and

(4) Continue the legislature's established policy of having employees contribute toward their retirement benefits.

[ 1995 c 239 s 201.]

NOTES:

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Effective date—Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: See notes following RCW 41.32.005.